Alaska statutes. Title 17. Food and Drugs.
Article 5. False Advertising.

Collateral references. —

3 Am. Jur. 2d, Advertising, §§ 3, 6 et seq.

37 Am. Jur. 2d, Fraud and Deceit, § 79.

What constitutes “false advertising” of food products or cosmetics within §§ 5 and 12 of the Federal Trade Commission Act (15 USCS §§ 45, 52), 50 ALR Fed. 16.

Sec. 17.20.160.
False advertising generally.

An advertisement of a food, drug, device, or cosmetic is false if it is false or misleading in any particular.

History.

(§ 20(a) ch 129 SLA 1949)

Sec. 17.20.170.
Specified false advertising.

The advertisement of a drug or device representing that it has an effect on albuminuria, appendicitis, arteriosclerosis, blood poison, bone disease, Bright’s disease, cancer, carbuncles, cholecystitis, diabetes, diphtheria, dropsy, erysipelas, gallstones, heart and vascular diseases, high blood pressure, mastoiditis, measles, meningitis, mumps, nephritis, otitis media, paralysis, pneumonia, poliomyelitis (infantile paralysis), prostate gland disorders, pyelitis, scarlet fever, sexual impotence, sinus infection, smallpox, tuberculosis, tumors, typhoid, uremia, or venereal disease is false advertising. An advertisement not in violation of AS

17.20.160

is not false under this section if it is disseminated only to members of the medical, dental, or veterinary profession, or appears only in the scientific periodicals of these professions, or is disseminated only for the purpose of public health education by persons not commercially interested, directly or indirectly, in the sale of the drug or device.
However, when the commissioner determines that an advance in medical science has made a self-medication safe as to any of the diseases named in this section, the department shall by regulation authorize the advertisement of drugs having curative or therapeutic effect for the disease, subject to the conditions and restrictions the commissioner considers necessary in the interests of public health.
This section shall not be construed as indicating that self-medication for diseases other than those named in this section is safe or efficacious.

History.

(§ 20(b) ch 129 SLA 1949)

Sec. 17.20.172.
Enforcement authority.

The commissioner is responsible for enforcing AS

17.20.160

—

17.20.175

, and may delegate that authority as appropriate. This section does not limit the authority of peace officers.

History.

(E.O. No. 51, § 19 (1981))

Sec. 17.20.175.
Definitions.

In AS

17.20.160

—

17.20.175

,

“commissioner” means the commissioner of health and social services;

“department” means the Department of Health and Social Services.

History.

(E.O. No. 51, § 19 (1981))